Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 12
TEACHERS

Section.

33-1201. Certificate required.

Every person who is employed to serve in any elementary or secondary school in the capacity of teacher, supervisor, administrator, education specialist, school nurse or school librarian shall be required to have and to hold a certificate issued under authority of the state board of education, valid for the service being rendered; except that the state board of education may authorize endorsement for use in Idaho, for not more than five (5) years, certificates valid in other states when the qualifications therefor are not lower than those required for an Idaho certificate.

No certificate shall be required of a student attending any teacher-training institution, who shall serve as a practice teacher in a classroom under the supervision of a certificated teacher, and who is jointly assigned by such teacher-training institution and the governing board of a district or a public institution to perform practice teaching in a non-salaried status. Those students attending a teacher-training institution of another state and who serve as a non-salaried practice teacher in an Idaho school district shall be registered by that school district.

A student, while serving in a practicum, internship or student teaching position under the supervision of a person certificated pursuant to this section, shall be accorded the same liability insurance coverage by the school district being served as that accorded such certificated person in the same district, and shall comply with all rules and regulations of the school district or public institution while serving in such a capacity.

33-1201A. Idaho professional endorsement — Eligibility.

Any instructional staff employee or any pupil service staff employee will receive mentoring as outlined in such employee’s individualized professional learning plan during the initial three (3) years of holding such certificate. Upon holding a certificate for three (3) years, any such instructional staff or pupil service staff employee may apply for an Idaho professional endorsement. Upon holding a professional endorsement for five (5) years or more, any such instructional staff or pupil service staff employee may apply for an Idaho advanced professional endorsement.

To be eligible for an Idaho professional endorsement, the instructional staff or pupil service staff employee must:

Have held a certificate for at least three (3) years, or have completed a state board of education-approved interim certificate of three (3) years or longer;

Show they met the professional compensation rung performance criteria for two (2) of the three (3) previous years or the third year;

Have a written recommendation from the employing school district; and

Have an annual individualized professional learning plan developed in conjunction with the employee’s school district supervisor.

To be eligible for an Idaho advanced professional endorsement, the instructional staff or pupil service staff employee must:

Have held a renewable certificate for at least eight (8) years or more, or have completed a state board of education-approved interim certificate of three (3) years or longer and held a renewable certificate for five (5) years or more;

Show they met the professional compensation rung performance criteria for four (4) of the five (5) previous years or the third, fourth, and fifth year;

During three (3) of the previous five (5) years, have served in an additional building or district leadership role in an Idaho public school, including but not limited to:

Instructional specialist or instructional coach;

Mentor;

Curriculum or assessment committee member;

Team or committee leadership position;

Data coach; or

Other leadership positions identified by the school district;

Effective July 1, 2021, through June 30, 2022, show they have met the advanced professional compensation rung performance criteria for three (3) of the five (5) previous years or the fourth and fifth year; or

Effective July 1, 2022, show they have met the advanced professional compensation rung performance criteria for three (3) of the five (5) previous years.

Have a written recommendation from the employing school district;

Have an annual individualized professional learning plan developed in conjunction with the employee’s supervisor and a self-evaluation; and
(f)(i) Effective July 1, 2020, through June 30, 2021, show they have met the advanced professional compensation rung performance criteria for three (3) of the five (5) previous years or the fifth year;

Instructional staff and pupil service staff shall be eligible for the professional endorsement if they:

Have a written recommendation from the employing school district;

Have worked in a certificated position in a compact-member state pursuant to section 33-4101, Idaho Code; and

Would have been eligible to work in a certificated position in an Idaho public school based on that certification for three (3) to eight (8) years.

Instructional staff and pupil service staff shall be eligible for the advanced professional endorsement if they:

Have a written recommendation from the employing school district;

Have worked in a certificated position in a compact-member state pursuant to section 33-4101, Idaho Code; and

Would have been eligible to work in a certificated position in an Idaho public school based on that certification for nine (9) years or more.

The state board of education shall promulgate rules implementing the provisions of this section.

For the purposes of this section:

“Certificate” means an Idaho instructional certificate, pupil service staff certificate, or out-of-state educator certificate that meets the requirements for reciprocity under rules promulgated by the state board of education;

In conjunction with the Idaho evaluation framework, “individualized professional learning plan” means an individualized professional development plan based on the Idaho framework for teaching evaluation and includes, at a minimum, identified interventions based on the individual’s strengths and areas of needed growth, how the individual will set student achievement and growth goals, areas of identified professional development and mentoring that target continuous improvement in professional areas, future student achievement, and school building or district culture;

“Instructional staff” means those involved in the direct instruction of a student or group of students and who hold a certificate issued under section 33-1201, Idaho Code;

“Pupil service staff” means those who provide services to students but are not involved in direct instruction of those students and who hold a certificate issued under section 33-1201, Idaho Code; and
(e) “School district” means a school district or a public charter school.

Instructional staff employees may provide additional evidence demonstrating effective teaching that may be considered in exceptional cases for purposes of determining proficiency and student achievement in the event required standards for professional endorsement are not met. Pupil service staff employees may provide additional evidence demonstrating effective student achievement or success that may be considered in exceptional cases for purposes of determining proficiency and student achievement or success in the event required standards for professional endorsement are not met.

Instructional staff employees may provide additional evidence demonstrating effective teaching that may be considered in exceptional cases for purposes of determining proficiency and student achievement in the event required standards for the advanced professional endorsement are not met. Pupil service staff employees may provide additional evidence demonstrating effective student achievement or success that may be considered in exceptional cases for purposes of determining proficiency and student achievement or success in the event required standards for the advanced professional endorsement are not met.

33-1201B. Grandfather rights for specific endorsements.

Individuals who held a specific endorsement issued or recognized by the state board of education or state department of education prior to July 1, 2020, which specific endorsement is no longer issued or recognized by the state board of education or state department of education as of July 1, 2020, shall hold the specific endorsement and be recognized as holding the specific endorsement.

Individuals who hold a specific endorsement issued or recognized by the state board of education or state department of education as of July 1, 2020, shall continue to hold the specific endorsement and be recognized as holding the specific endorsement even if, in the future, the state board of education or state department of education ceases to issue or recognize such specific endorsements.

33-1202. Eligibility for certificate.

Each applicant for a certificate must:

Have attained the age of eighteen (18) years;

Have completed specific minimum requirements in college training as specified in rules of the state board of education;

Be free from contagious disease; but if at any time there is probable cause to believe that any such employee of the district is so afflicted, the board shall cause examination to be made by a licensed physician, and may exclude the employee from service without loss of pay pending determination whether so afflicted.

Have on file with the state department of education the results of a criminal history check pursuant to section 33-130, Idaho Code. If an applicant is found to have been convicted of any of the felony crimes enumerated in section 33-1208, Idaho Code, a certificate shall not be issued to the applicant.

The state board of education may refuse to issue or authorize a certificate to any applicant for such reason as would have constituted grounds for revoking a certificate.

33-1203. Accredited teacher training requirements.

Except in the limited fields of trades and industries, and specialists certificates of school librarians and school nurses, the state board shall not authorize the issuance of any standard certificate premised upon less than four (4) years of accredited college training, including such professional training as the state board may require; but in emergencies, which must be declared, the state board may authorize the issuance of provisional certificates based on not less than two (2) years of college training.

33-1204. Validity, duration, renewal, and lapse of certificates.

The state board of education shall by rule provide for the validity, duration, renewal, and lapse of certificates. In addition, rules promulgated by the state board of education shall set forth criteria for renewal of administrator certificates, which shall include a requirement that administrator certificate holders must complete a course consisting of a minimum of three (3) semester credits in the statewide framework for teachers’ evaluations, such course shall include a laboratory component.

If the holder of a certificate who has undergone a criminal history check pursuant to district policy as provided in section 33-512(15), Idaho Code, is found to have been convicted of any felony crime enumerated in section 33-1208, Idaho Code, the certificate shall be revoked or suspended as provided in this chapter.

The state board of education may by rule require professional development credits as a condition of certificate renewal, provided that such rule must recognize providing instruction in a professional development course or in a course at an institution of higher education as an option to complete required credits.

33-1205. Certificate records and fees.

The state board of education shall cause to be maintained a record of all certificates issued, showing names, dates of issue and renewal, and if revoked, the date thereof and the reason therefor. A nonrefundable fee shall accompany each application for a prekindergarten through grade twelve (12) certificate, alternate certificate, change in certificate or replacement.

Certificate and related fees shall be as specified by rule of the state board of education.

The fees shall be used by the state department of education for payment of the expenses of the professional standards commission in performing its duties to sustain certification, program approvals, ethics reviews and standards reviews.

33-1206. Validity of existing certificates. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 35, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

33-1207. Endorsement and registration of certificates.

The board of trustees of each school district shall cause the certificates of each holder thereof to be endorsed (a) prior to beginning service for the first time with the district, or (b) in the first year after a new or renewed certificate is issued, showing the date of service thereunder; and shall cause to be maintained a continuing record of certificates, by style and number, of each certificated employee of the district.

33-1207A. Teacher preparation.

Higher Education Institutions. The state board shall review teacher preparation programs at the institutions of higher education under its supervision and shall assure that the course offerings and graduation requirements are consistent with the state board-approved, research-based “Idaho Comprehensive Literacy Plan.” To ensure compliance with this requirement, the board may allocate funds, subject to appropriation, to the higher education institutions that have teacher preparation programs.

Nonpublic Teacher Preparation Programs.

The state board shall grant teaching certificates to graduates of all already board-approved nonpublic teacher preparation programs that require their graduates to satisfy the following:

Hold a bachelor’s degree from an accredited four (4) year institution;

Submit to a criminal history check as described in section 33-130, Idaho Code;

Pass the required content training in the area or areas in which the graduate seeks to be endorsed. The content training must be in substantive alignment with knowledge or equivalent standards set forth in the initial standards for teacher certification, if any; and

Pass pedagogical training in substantive alignment with knowledge or equivalent standards set forth in the core standards of the initial standards for teacher certification, if any.

Teaching certificates granted pursuant to this subsection shall be equivalent to certificates granted to graduates of teacher preparation programs at public higher education institutions. Interim certificates shall be made available to graduates of programs without a student teaching or clinical component and standard certificates subsequently shall be made available upon satisfaction of state board of education mentoring requirements and other state statutory requirements pertaining to all teachers. All performance requirements shall be considered satisfied by completion of state board mentoring requirements. Reviews of nonpublic teacher preparation programs shall be limited to verification of the criteria set forth in this subsection.

For all Idaho teachers working on interim certificates, alternate routes or coming from out of state, completion of a state-approved reading instruction course shall be a onetime requirement for full certification.

The board of trustees of every school district shall include, in its plan for in-service training, coursework covering reading skills development, including diagnostic tools to review and adjust instruction continuously, and the ability to identify students who need special help in reading. The district plan for in-service training in reading skills shall be submitted to the state department of education for review and approval, in a format specified by the department.
(5) A board-approved nontraditional educator preparation program that has a contract with a local education agency or consortium thereof to recruit, select, train, and retain teachers to teach in public schools that struggle to recruit and retain teachers may obtain funding from the state department of education, subject to appropriation or other available funds, provided that the program shall match no less than one hundred percent (100%) of any cost to the state for implementation. The board-approved program must have a documented history of recruiting, training, and retaining high-quality teachers who achieve above-average academic growth from students in Idaho and other states. The nontraditional educator preparation program may apply to the state department of education for available funding at the time one (1) or more teachers recruited by the program enters into an employment contract with a local education agency (LEA). The amount of funding per teacher provided by the department to the program shall not exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of each teacher’s annual salary for each year the program is providing services in support of the teacher. Such funding is limited to two (2) academic years per teacher. In order for the program to obtain funding from the department:

The program and the LEA shall provide to the department verification of each teacher’s fulfillment of the annual employment contract; and

The program and the LEA shall provide verification that the LEA is providing funding to the program for recruiting and training each teacher in an amount equal to at least ten percent (10%) of the amount the department is providing to the program.

The higher education institutions shall be responsible for the preservice assessment measures for all kindergarten through grade 12 teacher preparation programs. The assessment must include a demonstration of teaching skills and knowledge congruent with current research on best reading practices. The assessment may consist of multiple measures, in alignment with best practices, for the demonstration of these skills. Each institution shall report annually to the state board of education the number of preservice teachers who have passed the assessment. The state board of education shall then compile the statewide results and report to the legislature and the governor.

33-1208. Revocation, suspension, denial, or place reasonable conditions on certificate — Grounds.

The professional standards commission may deny, revoke, suspend, or place reasonable conditions on any certificate issued or authorized under the provisions of section 33-1201, Idaho Code, upon any of the following grounds:

Gross neglect of duty;

Incompetency;

Breach of the teaching contract;

Making any material statement of fact in the application for a certificate that the applicant knows to be false;

Revocation, suspension, denial, or surrender of a certificate in another state for any reason constituting grounds for revocation in this state;

Conviction, finding of guilt, withheld judgment, or suspended sentence in this or any other state of a crime that is deemed relevant in accordance with section 67-9411(1), Idaho Code;

Conviction, finding of guilt, withheld judgment, or suspended sentence in this state or any other state for the delivery, manufacture, or production of controlled substances or simulated controlled substances as those terms are defined in section 37-2701, Idaho Code;

A guilty plea or a finding of guilt, notwithstanding the form of the judgment or withheld judgment, in this or any other state of the crime of involuntary manslaughter, section 18-4006(2) or (3), Idaho Code;

Any disqualification that would have been sufficient grounds for refusing to issue or authorize a certificate, if the disqualification existed or had been known at the time of its issuance or authorization;

Willful violation of any professional code or standard of ethics or conduct adopted by the state board of education;

The kidnapping of a child, section 18-4503, Idaho Code;

Conviction, finding of guilt, withheld judgment, or suspended sentence in this state or any other state of any crime that is deemed relevant in accordance with section 67-9411(1), Idaho Code, the commission of which renders the certificated person unfit to teach or otherwise perform the duties of the certificated person’s position.

The professional standards commission shall permanently revoke any certificate issued or authorized under the provisions of section 33-1201, Idaho Code, and shall deny the application for issuance of a certificate of a person who pleads guilty to or is found guilty of, notwithstanding the form of the judgment or withheld judgment, any of the following felony offenses:

Aggravated assault, section 18-905, Idaho Code, or assault with intent to commit a serious felony, section 18-909, Idaho Code.

Aggravated battery, section 18-907, Idaho Code, or battery with intent to commit a serious felony, section 18-911, Idaho Code.

The injury or death of a child, section 18-1501, Idaho Code.

The sexual abuse of a child under sixteen (16) years of age, section 18-1506, Idaho Code.

The ritualized abuse of a child under eighteen (18) years of age, section 18-1506A, Idaho Code.

The sexual exploitation of a child, section 18-1507, Idaho Code.

Lewd conduct with a child under the age of sixteen (16) years, section 18-1508, Idaho Code.

The sexual battery of a minor child sixteen (16) or seventeen (17) years of age, section 18-1508A, Idaho Code.

The sale or barter of a child for adoption or other purposes, section 18-1511, Idaho Code.

Murder, section 18-4003, Idaho Code, or voluntary manslaughter, section 18-4006(1), Idaho Code.

Kidnapping, section 18-4502, Idaho Code.

Interstate trafficking in prostitution, section 18-5601, Idaho Code.

Utilizing a person under eighteen (18) years of age for prostitution, section 18-5610, Idaho Code.

Rape, section 18-6101, Idaho Code.

The professional standards commission may investigate and follow the procedures set forth in section 33-1209, Idaho Code, for any allegation of inappropriate conduct as defined in this section by a holder of a certificate whether or not the holder has surrendered his certificate without a hearing or failed to renew his certificate. In those cases where the holder of a certificate has surrendered or failed to renew his certificate and it was found that inappropriate conduct occurred, the commission shall record such findings in the permanent record of the individual and shall deny the issuance of a teaching certificate.

Any person whose certificate may be or has been revoked, suspended or denied under the provisions of this section shall be afforded a hearing according to the provisions of section 33-1209, Idaho Code. Any person holding a certificate on or before July 1, 2020, who would not be eligible for a certificate by virtue of the provisions of this section shall be afforded a hearing according to the provisions of section 33-1209, Idaho Code, prior to revocation or denial of the individual’s certificate. Upon a showing of just and reasonable cause, the hearing panel shall have authority to grant an exception to the provisions of this section for such person.

The professional standards commission may deny the issuance of a certificate for any reason that would be a ground for revocation or suspension.

The general classes of felonies listed in this subsection shall include equivalent laws of federal or other state jurisdictions. For the purpose of this subsection, “child” means a minor or juvenile as defined by the applicable state or federal law.

33-1208A. Reporting requirements and immunity.

The board of trustees of a school district, through its designee, shall, within ten (10) days of the date the employment is severed, report to the chief officer of teacher certification the circumstances and the name of any educator who is dismissed, resigns or is otherwise severed from employment for reasons that could constitute grounds for revocation, suspension or denial of a certificate.

Any person providing a report under the provisions of this section shall have immunity from any liability, civil or criminal, that may otherwise be incurred or imposed. Any such person shall have the same immunity with respect to participation in any administrative or judicial proceeding resulting from such report. Any person who reports in bad faith or with malice shall not be protected by the provisions of this section.

33-1209. Proceedings to revoke, suspend, deny or place reasonable conditions on a certificate — Letters of reprimand — Complaint — Subpoena power — Hearing.

The professional standards commission may conduct investigations on any signed allegation of unethical conduct of any teacher brought by:

An individual with a substantial interest in the matter, except a student in an Idaho public school; or

A local board of trustees.

Proceedings to revoke or suspend any certificate issued under section 33-1201, Idaho Code, or to issue a letter of reprimand or place reasonable conditions on the certificate shall be commenced by a written complaint against the holder thereof. Such complaint shall be made by the chief certification officer stating the ground or grounds for issuing a letter of reprimand, placing reasonable conditions on the certificate, or for revocation or suspension and proposing that a letter of reprimand be issued, reasonable conditions be placed on the certificate, or the certificate be revoked or suspended. A copy of the complaint shall be served upon the certificate holder, either by personal service or by certified mail, within thirty (30) days of determination by the executive committee or such other time agreed to by the teacher and the chief certification officer.

Not more than thirty (30) days after the date of service of any complaint, the person complained against may request, in writing, a hearing upon the complaint. Any such request shall be made and addressed to the state superintendent of public instruction; and if no request for hearing is made, the grounds for suspension, revocation, placing reasonable conditions on the certificate, or issuing a letter of reprimand stated in the complaint shall be deemed admitted. Upon a request for hearing, the chief certification officer shall give notice, in writing, to the person requesting the hearing, which notice shall state the time and place of the hearing and which shall occur not more than ninety (90) days from the request for hearing or such other time agreed to by the teacher and the chief certification officer. The time of such hearing shall not be less than five (5) days from the date of notice thereof. Any such hearing shall be informal and shall conform with chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code. The hearing will be held within the school district in which any teacher complained of shall teach, or at such other place deemed most convenient for all parties.

Any such hearing shall be conducted by three (3) or more panel members appointed by the chairman of the professional standards commission, a majority of whom shall hold a position of employment the same as the person complained against. One (1) of the panel members shall serve as the panel chair. The panel chair shall be selected by the chairman of the professional standards commission from a list of former members of the professional standards commission who shall be instructed in conducting administrative hearings. No commission member who participated in the probable cause determination process in a given case shall serve on the hearing panel. All hearings shall be held with the object of ascertaining the truth. Any person complained against may appear in person and may be represented by legal counsel, and may produce, examine and cross-examine witnesses, and, if he chooses to do so, may submit for the consideration of the hearing panel a statement, in writing, in lieu of oral testimony, but any such statement shall be under oath and the affiant shall be subject to cross-examination.

The state superintendent of public instruction, as authorized by the state board of education, has the power to issue subpoenas and compel the attendance of witnesses and compel the production of pertinent papers, books, documents, records, accounts and testimony. The state board or its authorized representative may, if a witness refuses to attend or testify or to produce any papers required by such subpoena, report to the district court in and for the county in which the proceeding is pending, by petition, setting forth that a due notice has been given of the time and place of attendance of the witnesses, or the production of the papers, that the witness has been properly summoned, and that the witness has failed and refused to attend or produce the papers required by this subpoena before the board, or its representative, or has refused to answer questions propounded to him in the course of the proceedings, and ask for an order of the court compelling the witness to attend and testify and produce the papers before the board. The court, upon the petition of the board, shall enter an order directing the witness to appear before the court at a time and place to be fixed by the court in the order, the time to be not more than ten (10) days from the date of the order, and then and there shall show cause why he has not attended and testified or produced the papers before the board or its representative. A copy of the order shall be served upon the witness. If it shall appear to the court that the subpoena was regularly issued by the board and regularly served, the court shall thereupon order that the witness appear before the board at the time and place fixed in the order and testify or produce the required papers. Upon failure to obey the order, the witness shall be dealt with for contempt of court. The subpoenas shall be served and witness fees and mileage paid as allowed in civil cases in the district courts of this state.

Within twenty-one (21) days of the conclusion of any hearing dealing with the revocation, suspension, denial of a certificate, placing reasonable conditions on the certificate, or issuing a letter of reprimand, the hearing panel shall submit to the chief certification officer, to the person complained against and to the chief administrative officer of the public school employing the certificate holder, if any, a concise statement of the proceedings, a summary of the testimony, and any documentary evidence offered, together with the findings of fact and a decision. The hearing panel may determine to suspend or revoke the certificate, or the panel may order that reasonable conditions be placed on the certificate or a letter of reprimand be sent to the certificate holder, or if there are not sufficient grounds, the allegation against the certificate holder is dismissed and is so recorded.
(7) Within three (3) days of issuance, the hearing panel’s decision shall be made a permanent part of the record of the certificate holder. Should the final decision be to place reasonable conditions upon the certificate holder or a suspension or revocation of the teaching certificate, the professional standards commission must notify the employing public school of the hearing panel’s decision and to provide notice that such may negatively impact upon the employment status of the certificated employee.

The allegation shall state the specific ground or grounds for the allegation of unethical conduct that could lead to a possible revocation, suspension, placing reasonable conditions on the certificate, or issuance of a letter of reprimand. Upon receipt of a written and signed allegation of unethical conduct, the chief certification officer, in conjunction with the attorney general and the professional standards commission investigator, shall conduct a review of the allegation using established guidelines to determine whether to remand the issue to the school district to be resolved locally or to open an investigation and forward the case to the professional standards commission. Within fourteen (14) days of the decision to forward the case, the chief certification officer shall notify the complainant and the teacher, in writing, that an investigation will be conducted and the teacher shall be afforded an opportunity to respond to the allegation verbally and in writing prior to the issuance of the complaint. The executive committee of the professional standards commission shall review the circumstances of the forwarded case at one (1) of the two (2) next regularly scheduled meetings, and determine whether probable cause exists to warrant the filing of a complaint and the requesting of a hearing.

(8) The final decision of the hearing panel shall be subject to judicial review in accordance with the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, in the district court of the county in which the holder of a revoked certificate has been last employed as a teacher.

(9) Whenever any certificate has been revoked, suspended or has had reasonable conditions placed upon it, or an application has been denied, the professional standards commission may, upon a clear showing that the cause constituting grounds for the listed actions no longer exists, issue a valid certificate. Provided however, that no certificate shall be issued to any person who has been convicted of any crime listed in subsection (2) of section 33-1208, Idaho Code.

(10) For any person certified in another state and applying for certification in Idaho, and for any person previously certified in this state who is applying for certification in the event their certification has lapsed or is seeking renewal of a current certification, the chief certification officer shall deny an application for a new certificate or for a renewal of a certificate, regardless of the jurisdiction where such certificate was issued, if there are any unsatisfied conditions on such current or previously issued certificate or if there is any form of pending investigation by a state agency concerning the applicant’s teaching license or certificate. Provided however, the chief certification officer shall not automatically deny the application if such person authorized in writing that the chief certification officer and the professional standards commission shall have full access to the investigative files concerning the conditions on, or investigation concerning, such certificate in Idaho or any other state or province. Upon review of the information authorized for release by the applicant, the chief certification officer shall either grant or deny such application or, upon denial and upon written request made by the applicant within thirty (30) days of such denial, shall afford the applicant with the procedures set forth in subsections (3) through (9) of this section. If the applicant does not execute the written authorization discussed herein, reapplication may be made once all investigations have been completed and all conditions have been satisfied, resulting in a clear certificate from the issuing state or province.

(11) For the purposes of this section, the term “teacher” shall include any individual required to hold a certificate pursuant to section 33-1201, Idaho Code.